North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-09 Parent and Child
14-09-08.11.
Eligible child — Employer to permit enrollment — Employer duties and liabilities — Obligor contest. [Contingent effective date – See note]

When an obligor is required to cover a child as a beneficiary under section 14-09-08.10, the child is eligible for health insurance coverage as a dependent of the obligor. If health insurance coverage required under section 14-09-08.10 is available through an employer, the employer must:

Permit the obligor to enroll under family coverage any child who is otherwise eligible for coverage without regard to any open enrollment restrictions;

If the obligor is enrolled but fails to make application to obtain coverage for the child, enroll the child under family coverage upon application by the obligee;

Upon receipt of the national medical support notice issued under section 14-09-08.20:

Comply with the provisions of the national medical support notice; and

Transfer the national medical support notice to the insurer that provides any such health insurance coverage for which the child is eligible, within twenty business days after the date of the national medical support notice;

Not disenroll or eliminate coverage for any child unless the employer has eliminated family health coverage for all of its employees or the employer is provided satisfactory written evidence that:

The order issued under section 14-09-08.10 is no longer in effect; or

The child is or will be enrolled in comparable coverage that will take effect no later than the effective date of disenrollment;

Withhold from the obligor’s compensation the obligor’s share, if any, of premiums for health insurance coverage and pay this amount to the insurer;

If the amount required to be withheld under subdivision e, either alone or when added to the total of any withholding required by an order issued under section 14-09-09.15, exceeds fifty percent of the obligor’s disposable income, withhold fifty percent of the obligor’s disposable income;

In the case of an obligor contest under subsection 2, initiate and continue withholding until the employer receives notice that the contest is resolved; and

Promptly notify the child support agency, in the same manner as required under subsection 9 of section 14-09-09.16, whenever the obligor’s employment is terminated.

The obligor may contest the withholding provided for in subdivision e of subsection 1 by filing a request for a hearing within ten days of the date of the national medical support notice issued under section 14-09-08.20. If the obligor contests that withholding, the court shall:

Hold a hearing within ten working days after the date of the request; and

Confirm the withholding in the absence of a finding:

Of a mistake of fact; or

That the obligee is required to provide health insurance coverage pursuant to section 14-09-08.10.

Unless otherwise provided by the child support agency in compliance with rules promulgated by the secretary of the United States department of health and human services, the withholding provided in subdivision e of subsection 1 has priority over any other legal process against the same income, except that withholding required by an order issued under section 14-09-09.15 must be satisfied before any payment is made to the insurer. If the amount remaining is insufficient to pay the obligor’s share of premiums for health insurance coverage, the obligor may authorize additional withholding to pay the obligor’s share. If the obligor does not authorize additional withholding, and the health insurance coverage will lapse as a result, the employer must promptly inform the child support agency of the insufficiency.

An employer receiving a national medical support notice under this section is subject to the same duties and liabilities as an income payer under section 14-09-09.3 unless the context indicates otherwise.

For purposes of this section:

“Employer” means an entity or individual who would be determined to be an employer under section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended [26 U.S.C. 3401(d)], and includes any governmental entity and any labor organization; and

“Insurer” has the meaning provided in section 26.1-36.5-01.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 24; 1993, ch. 152, § 10; 1995, ch. 461, § 1; 1997, ch. 404, § 18; 1999, ch. 141, § 5; 2003, ch. 125, § 1; 2007, ch. 149, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 126, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 149, S.L. 2007 becomes effective on the date the Department of Human Services certifies to the Legislative Council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.

14-09-08.12.
Authorization to insurer.

The signature of the custodial parent of the insured dependent, the obligee, or the obligee’s assignee is a valid authorization to the insurer for purposes of processing an insurance reimbursement payment to the provider of the medical services, for the release of information concerning the insured dependent or coverage available to the insured dependent, and otherwise for purposes of verifying coverage and payment for the insured dependent, in the same manner and to the same extent as the signature of the insured.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 25; 1993, ch. 152, § 11.

14-09-08.13.
Application for service.

The child support agency shall take the appropriate steps to implement, modify, and enforce an order for dependent health insurance or other medical support whenever the children receive benefits through temporary assistance for needy families or foster care under chapter 50-09 or medical assistance under chapter 50-24.1, or whenever application is made and accepted for services provided by the child support agency.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 26; 1997, ch. 404, § 19; 2003, ch. 48, § 9; 2015, ch. 126, § 7, effective August 1, 2015.

14-09-08.14.
Child support agency to establish criteria.

The child support agency shall establish criteria to identify cases involving children who received benefits through temporary assistance for needy families or foster care under chapter 50-09 or medical assistance under chapter 50-24.1, or when an application to the child support agency has been completed by an obligee and when there is a high potential for obtaining medical support based on:

Evidence that health insurance may be available to the obligor at reasonable cost; and

Facts that are sufficient to warrant modification of the existing court order to include health insurance coverage for a dependent child.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 27; 1997, ch. 404, § 20; 2003, ch. 48, § 10.

14-09-08.15.
Reasonable cost of health insurance. [Contingent expiration date – See note]

For purposes of this chapter, health insurance is considered reasonable in cost if it is available to the obligor on a group basis or through an employer or union, regardless of service delivery mechanism, or as otherwise defined by the child support agency in compliance with rules promulgated by the secretary of the United States department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 28; 2005, ch. 415, § 3; 2007, ch. 149, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 149, S.L. 2007 becomes effective on the date the Department of Human Services certifies to the Legislative Council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.

Note.

Section 9 of ch. 124, S.L. 2013 provides for the repeal of this section (See contingent effective date note below).

Section 10 of chapter 124, S.L. 2013 provides in part:

“EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 and 9 of this Act become effective on the date the department of human services certifies to the legislative council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.”

14-09-08.15.
Reasonable cost of health insurance. [Contingent expiration date – See note]

For purposes of this chapter, health insurance is considered reasonable in cost if it is available to the obligor on a group basis or through an employer or union, regardless of service delivery mechanism, or as otherwise defined by the child support agency in compliance with rules promulgated by the secretary of the United States department of health and human services. The definition of reasonable cost established by the child support agency under this section must consider the scope of covered services, the cost of coverage, and the amount of any copayments or deductibles.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 28; 2005, ch. 415, § 3; 2007, ch. 149, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 149, S.L. 2007 becomes effective on the date the Department of Human Services certifies to the Legislative Council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.

Note.

Section 9 of ch. 124, S.L. 2013 provides for the repeal of this section (See contingent effective date note below).

Section 10 of chapter 124, S.L. 2013 provides in part:

“EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 and 9 of this Act become effective on the date the department of human services certifies to the legislative council as the effective date of rules adopted to implement this Act.”

14-09-08.16.
Requests for information from income payer.

The child support agency may mail a request for information to the income payer in any matter in which it secures reliable information that the income payer may be indebted to an obligor. The request must identify the obligor by name, and, if known, address and social security number.

Within ten days after receipt of a request for information issued under subsection 1, an income payer shall provide the requester with a written statement informing the requester whether or not the income payer is, or within the one hundred eighty days immediately preceding receipt of the request has been, an income payer with respect to that obligor. If the income payer is, or within the previous one hundred eighty days has been, an income payer with respect to that obligor, the income payer shall furnish information to the requester, including:

The amount of any income currently paid to the obligor, calculated on a monthly basis;

The total amount of income paid to the obligor in the twelve months preceding the month in which the request is received;

Information regarding any health insurance that may be made available to the obligor’s children through the income payer;

The social security number under which payment of any income by the income payer to the obligor is reported;

The obligor’s address; and

If the income payer is no longer an income payer with respect to that obligor, the date of last payment and any forwarding address.

Any income payer failing to comply with any requirements of this section may be punished for contempt of court. The court shall first afford such income payer a reasonable opportunity to purge itself of contempt.

A proceeding against an income payer under this section may be commenced upon motion by the child support agency and must be commenced within ninety days after the income payer’s act or failure to act upon which such proceeding is based.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 152, § 1; 2001, ch. 152, § 3; 2003, ch. 124, § 2.

14-09-08.17.
Delinquent obligor may not renounce claims.

An obligor whose child support obligation is delinquent may not renounce, waive, assign, transfer, or disclaim any interest that obligor might otherwise claim in a decedent’s estate, a trust, or a similar device, to the extent necessary to satisfy the delinquency. Any attempt to renounce, waive, assign, transfer, or disclaim such an interest is void if attempted after notice of the delinquency is furnished to the person administering the estate, trust, or similar device, and is otherwise voidable.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 155, § 1; 2007, ch. 148, § 4.

14-09-08.18.
Health insurance reimbursements received by but not owed to obligor to be paid over — Finding of contempt — Treatment as delinquent child support.

A payment for services rendered by a medical provider to an obligor’s dependent which is directed to the obligor in the form of reimbursements from health insurance must be paid to the medical provider, custodial parent, or child support agency when the reimbursement is not owed to the obligor.

Any child support order that requires an obligor to provide health insurance is deemed to include the requirements of this section. An obligor retaining insurance reimbursement not owed to the obligor may be found in contempt of a child support order that requires the obligor to provide health insurance.

Any insurance reimbursement received by the obligor, but not owed to the obligor, may be treated as delinquent child support thirty days after receipt by the obligor if not sooner paid to the medical provider, custodial parent, or child support agency, as their interests may appear, and is subject to all remedies available under this code for the collection of delinquent child support.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 461, § 2.

14-09-08.19.
Child support order — Required interest statement.

Each judgment or order requiring the payment of child support must include a statement that the child support obligation will accrue interest if not timely paid. Accrual of interest and validity of the order are not affected by a failure to include the statement required by this section.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 156, § 2.

14-09-08.20.
National medical support notice — Child support agency duties.

When an obligor is required to provide health insurance coverage for a child as a beneficiary under section 14-09-08.10, the order is being enforced under title IV-D, and the obligor’s employer has been identified, the child support agency shall use the national medical support notice, when appropriate, to enforce the provision of health insurance coverage for the child. The child support agency shall:

Serve the national medical support notice on the employer by first-class mail or in any other manner agreed to by the employer:

Within two business days after the date of entry in the state directory of new hires of an employee who is an obligor of an order being enforced under title IV-D if the employer was identified based upon that entry; or otherwise

Within a reasonable time;

Serve notice of the national medical support notice on the obligor by first-class mail at the obligor’s last-known address;

If the insurer notified the child support agency of more than one available health insurance coverage option, select:

The option chosen by the state Medicaid agency if an assignment under chapter 50-24.1 is in effect for the child;

The option timely chosen by the obligee if paragraph 1 does not apply;

The option that provides basic coverage, that is reasonably accessible to the child, and for which the obligor’s share of the premium is lowest if paragraphs 1 and 2 do not apply; or

The option that is reasonably accessible to the child and for which the obligor’s share of the premium is lowest if paragraphs 1, 2, and 3 do not apply; and

Promptly notify the employer when a current order for medical support for which the child support agency is responsible is no longer in effect.

If the child support agency does not select an option under subdivision c of subsection 1 within twenty business days, the insurer shall enroll the child, and the obligor if necessary, in the insurer’s default plan, if any.

The child support agency, the state Medicaid agency, and any official, employee, or agent of either agency are immune from any liability arising out of the selection of, or failure to select, an option under subdivision c of subsection 1.

For purposes of this section:

“Basic coverage” means health insurance that includes coverage for the following medically necessary services: preventive care, emergency care, inpatient and outpatient hospital care, physician services whether provided within or outside a hospital setting, diagnostic laboratory, and diagnostic and therapeutic radiological services;

“Employer” means an entity or individual who would be determined to be an employer under section 3401(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended [26 U.S.C. 3401(d)], and includes any governmental entity and any labor organization;

“Insurer” has the meaning provided in section 26.1-36.5-01;

“National medical support notice” means the notice promulgated pursuant to section 401(b) of the Child Support Performance and Incentive Act of 1998 [Pub. L. 105-200; 112 Stat. 645] and regulations adopted thereunder; and

“Title IV-D” has the meaning provided in section 50-09-01.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 125, § 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 1.

14-09-08.21.
Termination of parental rights — Duty of support. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A termination of parental rights does not terminate the duty of either parent to support the child before the child’s adoption unless that duty is specially terminated by order of the court after notice of a proposed termination or relinquishment is given to the department of human services in the manner appropriate for the service of process in a civil action in this state. A termination of a child support obligation under this section does not relieve a parent of the duty to pay any unpaid child support.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 2.

14-09-08.21.
Termination of parental rights — Duty of support. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A termination of parental rights does not terminate the duty of either parent to support the child before the child’s adoption unless that duty is specially terminated by order of the court after notice of a proposed termination or relinquishment is given to the department of health and human services in the manner appropriate for the service of process in a civil action in this state. A termination of a child support obligation under this section does not relieve a parent of the duty to pay any unpaid child support.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 35, effective September 1, 2022.

14-09-08.22.
Enforcement of health insurance coverage from an obligee.

When an obligee is required to provide health insurance coverage for a child as a beneficiary under section 14-09-08.10, the order is being enforced under title IV-D, and the obligee’s employer has been identified, the child support agency may use the national medical support notice to enforce the provision of health insurance coverage for the child. When the national medical support notice is used under this section, sections 14-09-08.11, 14-09-08.20, and 26.1-36.5-03 apply unless the context indicates otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 148, § 5.

14-09-09.
Liability of stepparent for support.

A stepparent is not bound to maintain the spouse’s dependent children, as defined in section 50-09-01, unless the child is received into the stepparent’s family. If the stepparent receives them into the family, the stepparent is liable, to the extent of the stepparent’s ability, to support them during the marriage and so long thereafter as they remain in the stepparent’s family. Such liability may be enforced against the stepparent by any person furnishing necessaries to such children. If an order issued under section 14-09-08.10 requires an obligee to provide health insurance coverage, any coverage that is available to the stepparent for the obligee’s dependent children is considered to be available to the obligee and is enforceable against the stepparent by a child support agency. If the children are received into the stepparent’s family and supported by the stepparent, it is presumed that the stepparent does so as a parent, in which case the children are not liable to the stepparent for their support, nor the stepparent to them for their services. The legal obligation of a natural or adoptive parent to support that person’s children is not affected by the liability imposed upon their stepparent by this section.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 100; R.C. 1895, § 2790; R.C. 1899, § 2790; R.C. 1905, § 4102; C.L. 1913, § 4434; R.C. 1943, § 14-0909; S.L. 1971, ch. 153, § 1; 1983, ch. 172, § 32; 2007, ch. 148, § 6.

14-09-09.1.
Child support — Wage assignment — Procedures. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 16.

14-09-09.2.
Child support — Alternative procedure to withhold and transmit earnings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 16.

14-09-09.3.
Child support — Duties and liabilities of income payer under income withholding order.

Any failure of an income payer to comply with this section or section 14-09-09.16 may be sanctioned as a contempt of court. The court shall first afford such income payer a reasonable opportunity to purge itself of the contempt.

Any income payer who fails or refuses to withhold or deliver income pursuant to an income withholding order, when such income payer has had in its possession such income, is personally liable for the amount of such income which the income payer failed or refused to withhold or deliver, together with costs, interest, and reasonable attorney’s fees. If an income payer fails or refuses to withhold or deliver income for more than fourteen business days after the date an obligor is paid, the court shall award damages in an amount equal to two hundred dollars or actual damages caused by the violation, whichever is greater, in addition to the amount of income that should have been withheld or delivered, costs, interest, late fees, and reasonable attorney’s fees. Any damages awarded under this subsection must be allocated by the court between each affected obligor and obligee, or made payable on behalf of an obligor to the state disbursement unit for distribution under section 14-09-25. Each remedy authorized in this subsection is a remedial sanction as defined in section 27-10-01.1.

Any employer who refuses to employ, dismisses, demotes, disciplines, or in any way penalizes an obligor on account of any proceeding to collect child support, on account of any order or orders entered by the court in such proceeding, on account of the employer’s compliance with such order or orders, or on account of an income withholding order, is liable to the obligor for all damages, together with costs, interest thereon, and reasonable attorney’s fees resulting from the employer’s action. The employer may be required to make full restitution to the aggrieved obligor, including reinstatements and backpay.

An income payer may be enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from continuing any action in violation of section 14-09-09.16.

Any contempt proceeding against an income payer under this section must be commenced within one year after the income payer’s act or failure to act upon which such proceeding is based.

Compliance by an income payer with an income withholding order operates as a discharge of the income payer’s liability to the obligor as to that portion of the obligor’s income so affected.

In considering an income withholding order issued by a court or administrative tribunal in a state other than the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment, the income payer shall apply the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment in determining any withholding terms and conditions not specified in the income withholding order or in section 14-12.2-33.1.

An employer who complies with an income withholding order that is regular on its face is not subject to civil liability to any individual or agency for conduct in compliance with the order.

An income payer who fails to withhold or deliver income for more than seven business days after the date one or more obligors are paid may be charged a late fee equal to twenty-five dollars per obligor for each additional business day the payment is delinquent or seventy-five dollars for each additional business day the payment is delinquent, whichever is greater. A late fee charged under this subsection is payable fifteen days after service on the employer, by first-class mail, of notice of the imposition of the late fee. Failure to pay a late fee under this subsection may be sanctioned as a contempt of court. Any late fee assessed by the child support agency under this subsection must be paid to the state disbursement unit for distribution under section 14-09-25 and any remaining balance must be paid to the obligor. If an income payer has failed to withhold or deliver income for more than one obligor, any late fees collected under this section must be divided equally among all affected obligors.

If an income payer makes an error in the remittal information the income payer provides to the state disbursement unit, the income payer has not complied with this section and is responsible for the error, but has a cause of action for reimbursement against any person that receives funds from the disbursement unit as a result of the error and refuses to return the funds upon request.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 196, § 3; 1987, ch. 183, § 15; 1997, ch. 404, § 22; 2001, ch. 152, § 4; 2003, ch. 124, §§ 3, 4; 2005, ch. 415, § 4; 2009, ch. 148, § 1; 2009, ch. 419, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Summary of North Dakota Supreme Court Decisions on Family Law — Child Support, 71 N.D. L. Rev. 883 (1995).

14-09-09.4.
Child support — Order for wage assignment or to withhold and transmit earnings — Dissolution, revocation or modification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 16.

14-09-09.5.
Child support — Judgment or order as lien on property — Duration — Effect. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 172, § 1.

14-09-09.6.
Voluntary income withholding for support — Limitations.

An obligor may execute a document voluntarily authorizing income withholding from current or future income due the obligor from an income payer in an amount sufficient to meet any child support obligation imposed by a court or otherwise. An income withholding authorization made under this section is binding on the income payer one week after service upon the income payer by first-class mail, or in any other manner agreed to by the income payer, of a true copy of the executed income withholding authorization. The income payer shall deduct the sum or sums specified and pay them as specified by the income withholding authorization and any applicable imposition of a support obligation by a court. In addition, the income payer may deduct a fee of three dollars per month from the obligor’s income to cover expenses involved in transmitting payment. Compliance by an income payer with an income withholding authorization issued under this section discharges the income payer’s liability to the obligor for that portion of the obligor’s income. The income payer may not use the income withholding authorization as a basis for any disciplinary action against the obligor.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 181, § 1; 1987, ch. 181, § 7; 1989, ch. 148, § 3; 1999, ch. 141, § 6.

14-09-09.7.
Child support guidelines. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall establish child support guidelines to assist courts in determining the amount a parent should be expected to contribute toward the support of the child under this section. The guidelines must:

Include consideration of gross income. For purposes of the guidelines, gross income does not include an employee benefit over which the employee does not have significant influence or control over the nature or amount unless:

That benefit may be liquidated; and

Liquidation of that benefit does not result in the employee incurring an income tax penalty.

Authorize an expense deduction for determining net income.

Designate other available resources to be considered.

Specify the circumstances that should be considered in reducing support contributions on the basis of hardship.

Include consideration of extended periods of time a minor child spends with the child’s obligor parent.

Authorize a rebuttal of the presumption provided in subsection 4 based on the proportionate net income of the obligor and the obligee when the net income of the obligee is at least three times higher than the net income of the obligor.

Include consideration of an obligated party’s responsibility for health insurance coverage or other medical support under section 14-09-08.10.

The guidelines may not take into consideration cases of atypical overtime wages or nonrecurring bonuses over which the obligor does not have significant influence or control.

The department shall accept and compile pertinent and reliable information from any available source in order to establish the child support guidelines. Copies of the guidelines must be made available to courts, state’s attorneys, and upon request, to any other state or county officer or agency engaged in the administration or enforcement of this chapter.

There is a rebuttable presumption that the amount of child support that would result from the application of the child support guidelines is the correct amount of child support. The presumption may be rebutted if a preponderance of the evidence in a contested matter establishes, applying criteria established by the child support agency which take into consideration the best interests of the child, that the child support amount established under the guidelines is not the correct amount of child support. A written finding or a specific finding on the record must be made if the court determines that the presumption has been rebutted. The finding must:

State the child support amount determined through application of the guidelines;

Identify the criteria that rebut the presumption of correctness of that amount; and

State the child support amount determined after application of the criteria that rebut the presumption.

The department shall institute a new rulemaking proceeding under section 28-32-02 relating to the child support guidelines to ensure that the application of the guidelines results in the determination of appropriate child support award amounts. The initial rulemaking proceeding must be commenced with a notice of proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal by August 1, 1998, and subsequent rulemaking proceedings must be so commenced at least once every four years thereafter. Before commencing any rulemaking proceeding under this section, the department shall convene a drafting advisory committee that includes two members of the legislative assembly appointed by the chairman of the legislative management.

The guidelines established under this section may include a separate amount of child support for the child’s health insurance coverage, reimbursement for public health coverage provided under chapter 50-29, and other medical support.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 181, § 1; 1989, ch. 148, § 4; 1993, ch. 152, § 12; 1997, ch. 404, § 23; 1999, ch. 144, § 1; 1999, ch. 145, § 1; 2001, ch. 154, § 1; 2007, ch. 148, § 7; 2007, ch. 149, §§ 4, 5; 2009, ch. 148, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 97.

14-09-09.7.
Child support guidelines. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish child support guidelines to assist courts in determining the amount a parent should be expected to contribute toward the support of the child under this section. The guidelines must:

Include consideration of gross income. For purposes of the guidelines, gross income does not include an employee benefit over which the employee does not have significant influence or control over the nature or amount unless:

That benefit may be liquidated; and

Liquidation of that benefit does not result in the employee incurring an income tax penalty.

Authorize an expense deduction for determining net income.

Designate other available resources to be considered.

Specify the circumstances that should be considered in reducing support contributions on the basis of hardship.

Include consideration of extended periods of time a minor child spends with the child’s obligor parent.

Authorize a rebuttal of the presumption provided in subsection 4 based on the proportionate net income of the obligor and the obligee when the net income of the obligee is at least three times higher than the net income of the obligor.

Include consideration of an obligated party’s responsibility for health insurance coverage or other medical support under section 14-09-08.10.

The guidelines may not take into consideration cases of atypical overtime wages or nonrecurring bonuses over which the obligor does not have significant influence or control.

The department shall accept and compile pertinent and reliable information from any available source in order to establish the child support guidelines. Copies of the guidelines must be made available to courts, state’s attorneys, and upon request, to any other state or county officer or agency engaged in the administration or enforcement of this chapter.

There is a rebuttable presumption that the amount of child support that would result from the application of the child support guidelines is the correct amount of child support. The presumption may be rebutted if a preponderance of the evidence in a contested matter establishes, applying criteria established by the child support agency which take into consideration the best interests of the child, that the child support amount established under the guidelines is not the correct amount of child support. A written finding or a specific finding on the record must be made if the court determines that the presumption has been rebutted. The finding must:

State the child support amount determined through application of the guidelines;

Identify the criteria that rebut the presumption of correctness of that amount; and

State the child support amount determined after application of the criteria that rebut the presumption.

The department shall institute a new rulemaking proceeding under section 28-32-02 relating to the child support guidelines to ensure that the application of the guidelines results in the determination of appropriate child support award amounts. The initial rulemaking proceeding must be commenced with a notice of proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal by August 1, 1998, and subsequent rulemaking proceedings must be so commenced at least once every four years thereafter. Before commencing any rulemaking proceeding under this section, the department shall convene a drafting advisory committee that includes two members of the legislative assembly appointed by the chairman of the legislative management.

The guidelines established under this section may include a separate amount of child support for the child’s health insurance coverage, reimbursement for public health coverage provided under chapter 50-29, and other medical support.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 181, § 1; 1989, ch. 148, § 4; 1993, ch. 152, § 12; 1997, ch. 404, § 23; 1999, ch. 144, § 1; 1999, ch. 145, § 1; 2001, ch. 154, § 1; 2007, ch. 148, § 7; 2007, ch. 149, §§ 4, 5; 2009, ch. 148, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 97; 2021, ch. 352, § 36, effective September 1, 2022.

14-09-09.8.
Out-of-state wage withholding orders — Filing requirements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 16.

14-09-09.9.
Effect of filing out-of-state wage withholding order. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 16.

14-09-09.10.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Arrears registry” means the registry maintained under section 50-09-02.7.

“Business day” means every day that is not a Saturday or legal holiday.

“Child support” means payments for the support of a child, including payments for health insurance coverage or other medical support, and payments for the support of spouses or former spouses with whom the child is living as long as the spousal support payment is owed to the spouse or former spouse under the same order as the payments for the child, if the payment is required by the order of a court or other governmental agency having authority to issue such orders, and includes past-due support.

“Child support agency” means the department of human services in execution of its duties pursuant to the state plan submitted under chapter 50-09 in conformance with title IV-D of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 93-647; 88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. 651 et seq.].

“Delinquent” means a situation which occurs on the first working day after the day upon which a child support payment was identified as due and unpaid, and the total amount of unpaid child support is at least equal to the amount of child support payable in one month.

“Disposable income” means gross income less deductions required by law for taxes and social security.

“Employer” means income payer.

“Health insurance” includes fees for service, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, comprehensive health association plan, accident and health insurance policies, group health plans as defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [Pub. L. 99-272; 100 Stat. 281; 29 U.S.C. 1167(1)], and other types of coverage under which major medical coverage may be provided in a policy, plan, or contract which may legally be sold or provided in this state.

“Income” means any form of payment, regardless of source, owed to an obligor, including any earned, unearned, taxable or nontaxable income, workforce safety and insurance benefits, disability benefits, unemployment compensation benefits, annuity and retirement benefits, but excluding public assistance benefits administered under state law.

“Income payer” means any person, partnership, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association, political subdivision, or department or agency of the state or federal government owing income to an obligor and includes an obligor if the obligor is self-employed.

“Monthly support obligation” means an amount of child support ordered by a court or administrative tribunal in a proceeding to establish or modify a child support obligation, including amounts that are deferred for payment at a later date. The term is defined without regard to any amount of child support that an obligor is required to pay to avoid being held in contempt of court. If an amount of past-due support has been ordered as a lump sum rather than determined on a monthly basis, “monthly support obligation” means one hundred sixty-eight dollars.

“Obligee” means a person, including a state or political subdivision, to whom a duty of support is owed.

“Obligor” means any person owing a duty of support.

“Past-due support” means child support that is not paid by the earlier of:

The date a court order or an order of an administrative process established under state law requires payment to be made; or

The last day of the month or other period the payment was intended to cover.

“Payday” means the day upon which the income payer pays or otherwise credits the obligor.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 183, § 2; 1987, ch. 181, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 9; 1989, ch. 148, § 5; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 461, § 3; 1997, ch. 404, § 25; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 415, § 5; 2007, ch. 417, § 2; 2007, ch. 149, § 6; 2009, ch. 419, § 3; 2013, ch. 12, § 8.